District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.04

Public hearing required.

Except as provided in § 9-202.05, the Council shall hold a public hearing on all applications to close all or part of a street or alley.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 204, 30 DCR 148

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-202.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-424.